Alabama, session 2026rs, HB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning on October 1, 2026, any
general aviation aircraft and any machinery or equipment to be
installed on these aircraft are exempt from ad valorem tax.
(b) For the purposes of this act, the term "general
aviation aircraft" means an aircraft that meets all of the
following:
(1) Is used in civil aviation.
(2) Is not a commercial aircraft, military aircraft, or
unmanned aerial vehicle or drone.
(3) Is owned or leased by a company whose principle
place of business is in the State of Alabama.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the
Page 1

(c) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the
HB185 INTRODUCED
implementation and administration of this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2